Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,144
Community eligibility provision; state aid and federal funds; State Department of Education; duties.

The State Department of Education shall promote the community eligibility provision to schools and school districts eligible to participate, and such promotion shall include, but is not limited to, providing official departmental guidance regarding the options available to schools and school districts for implementation and options for school districts in maintaining state aid and federal funds.

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 23.